Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-355
Transporter, defined.

Transporter means any person lawfully engaged in the business of transporting motor vehicles or trailers not his or her own solely for delivery thereof (1) by driving singly, (2) by driving in combinations by the towbar, fullmount, or saddlemount method or any combination thereof, or (3) when a truck or truck-tractor tows a trailer.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 55;

Laws 2007, LB286, § 30.